Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 7. Nonpermanent Employees.

Sec. 39.25.195.
Appointment of nonpermanent employees.

An individual may not be appointed as a nonpermanent employee in the state service without prior written approval of the director except as an emergency employee.

An appointment to state service, except an emergency appointment, shall be made from the list of applicants qualified for the position unless, in appropriate circumstances, the director has waived this requirement.

An appointment of a nonpermanent employee may not be made unless the request for authorization is approved by the director, adequate money is available for the anticipated duration of the appointment, and the director determines that the hiring department or agency has certified that

the legislature has appropriated money for the work in question knowing that it is to be performed by a nonpermanent employee;

there is an immediate need to fill an authorized, permanent position and it is impractical either to establish or recruit for the position within a reasonable time;

an immediate need exists and the director determines that the hiring department or agency could not reasonably have been expected to anticipate and meet that need through the creation of a permanent position; or

a program or project exists and the director determines that the need for employees can most appropriately be met through the use of program or project employees.

The director may not authorize the appointment of a nonpermanent employee if the director determines that

the need for the nonpermanent employee can practicably be met through establishing and filling an authorized permanent position;

the need for the nonpermanent employee would be more appropriately met through an emergency appointment; or

the need for the nonpermanent employee is not immediate and could reasonably have been anticipated and met by the appointing authority through the creation and filling of a permanent position.

A nonpermanent employee may not be placed on the state payroll unless the director has first approved the personnel action for the employee’s appointment.

This section does not prevent the director from adopting regulations to provide for timely substitution for permanent employees on medical or personal leave or other situations in which the appointment of an emergency or permanent employee would be inappropriate or when delay in making a temporary replacement would cause serious disruption.

A department or agency may not use nonpermanent employees to perform a given work assignment for more than 120 calendar days in a 12-month period. A department or agency may not employ any individual as a nonpermanent employee for more than 120 calendar days in a 12-month period. In appropriate circumstances the director may authorize an extension of the limit imposed by this subsection if the director finds that there is an immediate need for the extension. The limit imposed by this subsection does not apply to program or project employees or to substitutes appointed under (f) of this section.

A hiring department or agency shall certify to the director within 15 working days following the appointment its reasons for appointing an emergency employee.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1979; am § 74 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 6 SLA 1998; am §§ 12, 13 ch 111 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent and findings related to AS

39.25.195

—

39.25.200

, see § 1, ch. 67, SLA 1979.

Administrative Code. —

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

For leave, see 2 AAC 7, art. 11.

Sec. 39.25.196.
Local hiring exception.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

39.25.195

, a hiring department or agency may grant a preference to local residents in the appointment of nonpermanent employees or in the appointment of permanent employees to perform seasonal work assignments of 180 calendar days or less in a 12-month period. If there are no local residents on the applicable list of applicants qualified for a nonpermanent or a permanent seasonal position or if the local residents on the applicable list of applicants qualified for the position are unavailable, the hiring department or agency may obtain referrals of qualified job applicants for these positions from the job service office of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development serving the area and, from those applicants, select a qualified person who is a local resident for the position.

Appointment of a nonpermanent employee in accordance with (a) of this section does not require the prior written approval of the director under AS

39.25.195

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 89 SLA 1982; am § 14 ch 111 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

39.25.181

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For recruitment and examination, see 2 AAC 7, art. 2.

Sec. 39.25.197.
Termination of nonpermanent employees.

When the director determines that an employee has been appointed as a result of a false certification under AS

39.25.195

, the director shall immediately notify the head of the affected department or agency in writing and the department or agency shall terminate the employee from state service within one working day after receipt of notice.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1979)

Sec. 39.25.198.
Civil liability.

A person who makes a false certificate under AS

39.25.195

is personally liable in a civil action to an individual terminated under AS

39.25.197

for any resultant damages and for punitive damages of an amount not to exceed three times the gross monthly salary at which the nonpermanent employee was appointed.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1979)

Sec. 39.25.200.
Definitions.

In AS

39.25.195

—

39.25.200

,

“certified” means signed by the head of a department or agency or by a responsible person designated by the head of a department or agency;

“director” means the director of the division of personnel;

“emergency employee” means an employee appointed for a period not to exceed 30 calendar days, whose appointment was made under conditions requiring immediate action to carry on work that is required in the public interest;

“nonpermanent employee” means a person who is employed in state service in a position that is not in the exempt or partially exempt service and who is not a permanent or an emergency employee;

“permanent employee” means an employee who has been appointed to an authorized, permanent full-time or part-time or permanent seasonal position in the classified service and who is in the process of completing or has successfully completed the required probationary service in that position;

“program or project employee” means a nonpermanent employee, including a student intern, who is employed in state service with prior written understanding that employment in that position will continue for at most the duration of a specified program or project that is not a regular and continuing function of a department or agency and that has an established probable date of termination.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1979; am § 79 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Sec. 39.25.210.
[Renumbered as AS 39.25.900.]

Sec. 39.25.220.
[Renumbered as AS 39.25.995.]